Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1309
Effective date of registration; statement of record; suspension; when; hearing; when.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the effective date of the registration of the retirement subdivision or community shall be the sixtieth day after the filing of the statement of record or such earlier date as the agency may determine, having due regard to the public interest and the protection of purchasers. If any amendment is filed prior to the effective date, the statement of record shall be deemed to have been filed when such amendment was filed.

(2) If it appears to the agency that the statement of record, or any amendment thereto, is on its face incomplete or inaccurate in any material aspect, the agency shall notify the developer prior to the date the registration would otherwise be effective. Such notification shall serve to suspend the effective date of the filing until the sixtieth day after the developer files such additional information as the agency shall require. If the developer fails to provide additional information as required by the agency within ninety days after receiving notice, the agency may deny the registration.

(3) Any developer, upon notice of suspension as identified in subsection (2) of this section or denial of registration, may within twenty days after the date of such notice file a request for hearing, and such hearing shall be held within forty-five days after the receipt of such request and in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the agency.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 61, § 8.